Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1659.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-6-103, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 215, O.S.L. 2025 (10A O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 1-6-103), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1-6-103. A. Juvenile court records and Department of


Human Services agency records pertaining to a child may be


inspected, and their contents shall be disclosed, without a court


order to the following persons upon showing of proper credentials


and pursuant to their lawful duties:


1. The court having the child currently before it in any


proceeding pursuant to this title, any district court or tribal


court to which such proceedings may be transferred, employees and

Req. No. 3119 Page 1


officers of the court in the performance of their duties, including,


but not limited to, guardians ad litem appointed by the court, and


court-appointed special advocates;


2. A district attorney, United States Attorney, or Attorney


General of this or another state and the employees of such offices


in the course of their official duties pursuant to this title or the


prosecution of crimes against children, or upon their request in


their official capacity as advisor in a grand jury proceeding;


3. The attorney representing a child who is the subject of a


proceeding pursuant to the provisions of this title or other


proceeding where child custody or visitation is at issue;


4. Employees of juvenile bureaus in the course of their


official duties pursuant to this title, and employees of the


Department of Human Services in the course of their official duties;


5. Employees of a law enforcement agency of this or another


state or military enclave and employees of a child protective


service of another state or military enclave in the course of their


official duties pertaining to investigations of a report of known or


suspected child abuse or neglect or crimes against children or for


the purpose of determining whether to place a child in protective


custody;


6. The Oklahoma Commission on Children and Youth as provided by


Sections 601.2 and 601.6 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


7. The Office of Juvenile Affairs;

Req. No. 3119 Page 2


8. A federally recognized Indian tribe in which the child who


is the subject of the record is a member or is eligible to become a


member of the tribe and is the biological child of a member of an


Indian tribe pursuant to the provisions of the Federal federal


Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 and the Oklahoma Indian Child


Welfare Act; provided such Indian tribe, in the course of its


official duties, is:


a. investigating a report of known or suspected child


abuse or neglect or crimes against children or for the


purpose of determining whether to place a child in


protective custody,


b. providing services to or for the benefit of a child


including, but not limited to, protective, emergency,


social, and medical services, or


c. the tribe, the tribal court, or the tribal child


welfare program has asserted jurisdiction or


intervened in any case in which the child is the


subject of the proceedings or is a party to the


proceedings pursuant to the authority provided in the


Oklahoma Indian Child Welfare Act.


The records that are to be provided to Indian tribes under this


subsection shall include all case records, reports, and documents as


defined in Section 1-6-101 of this title;



Req. No. 3119 Page 3


9. The Governor or to any person the Governor designates, in


writing;


10. Any federal official of the United States Department of


Health and Human Services;


11. Any member of the Legislature approved in writing by the


Speaker of the House of Representatives or the President Pro Tempore


of the Senate in the course of their official duties;


12. A foster parent, with regard to records concerning the


social, medical, psychological, or educational needs of a child


currently placed with that foster parent or of a child being


considered for placement with that foster parent;


13. An employee of any state or federal corrections or law


enforcement agency in the performance of the official duties of the


employee concerning presentence investigations or supervision of a


parent of an alleged or adjudicated deprived child, or the legal


guardian, custodian, or any other adult member of the child’s home


who is responsible for the health, safety, or welfare of the child;


14. An employee of a state agency of this or another state in


the performance of the official duties of the employee concerning


the establishment of paternity or the establishment or enforcement


of a child support order or other entitlement for the benefit of a


child; provided, disclosure shall be limited to information directly


related to the purpose of such disclosure;



Req. No. 3119 Page 4


15. Any member of a city-county Health Department health


department Fetal Infant Mortality Review (FIMR) in the performance


of the official duties of the member concerning investigations of


fetal and infant mortalities; provided, disclosure shall be limited


to information directly related to the purpose of such disclosure;


16. Any designated federal authorities at the federal military


installation where a service member is assigned, when the child is a


member of an active duty military family, as provided by paragraph 4


of subsection A of Section 1-2-102 of this title;


17. Any member of the Child Welfare Review Committee for the


Death and Near Death of Children With Disabilities as established by


Section 1-10-103 of this title; and


18. The Office of Client Advocacy within the State Department


of Health.


B. In addition to the persons listed in subsection A of this


section, juvenile court records may be inspected, and their contents


shall be disclosed, without a court order to the following persons


upon showing of proper credentials and pursuant to their lawful


duties:


1. Employees of court-appointed special advocate programs, as


defined in Section 1-1-105 of this title, in the course of their


official duties pertaining to recruiting, screening, training,


assigning cases, supervising, and supporting volunteers in their



Req. No. 3119 Page 5


roles as guardian ad litem pursuant to Section 1-4-306 of this


title;


2. Members of postadjudication review boards established


pursuant to the provisions of Section 1116.2 of Title 10 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, the Child Death Review Board, and


multidisciplinary personnel. In addition to juvenile court records,


members of such postadjudication review boards may inspect, without


a court order, information that includes, but is not limited to:


a. psychological and medical records,


b. placement history and information, including the names


and addresses of foster parents,


c. family assessments,


d. treatment or service plans, and


e. school records;


3. The Department of Human Services or other public or private


agency or individual having court-ordered custody or physical


custody pursuant to Department placement of the child, or conducting


a child abuse or neglect investigation of the child who is the


subject of the record. In addition to juvenile court records,


employees of the Department may inspect, without a court order and


upon a showing of proper credentials and pursuant to their lawful


duties, information that includes, but is not limited to:


a. psychological and medical records, and


b. nondirectory education records;

Req. No. 3119 Page 6


4. The child who is the subject of the record and the parents,


legal guardian, custodian, or foster parent of such child; and


5. A person authorized by the court to conduct bona fide


research, provided such research may not publish the names or


identities of parents, children, or other persons contained in the


records.


C. In addition to the persons and entities named in subsection


A of this section, Department of Human Services agency records may


be inspected, and their contents shall be disclosed, without a court


order to the following persons upon showing of proper credentials


and pursuant to their lawful duties:


1. Postadjudicatory review boards, court-appointed special


advocates, and members of the Child Death Review Board;


2. Any district court which has ordered a home study by the


Department in an action for divorce, annulment, custody of a child,


or appointment of a legal guardian of a child, or any subsequent


proceeding in such actions; provided, however, the Department may


limit disclosure in the home study to summaries or to information


directly related to the purpose of the disclosure;


3. Members of multidisciplinary teams or multidisciplinary


personnel designated by the Department, investigating a report of


known or suspected child abuse or neglect or providing services to a


child or family which is the subject of the report;



Req. No. 3119 Page 7


4. A physician who has before him or her a child whom the


physician reasonably suspects may be abused or neglected or any


health care or mental health professionals involved in the


evaluation or treatment of the child or the parents, legal guardian,


foster parent, custodian, or other family members of the child;


5. Any public or private agency or person authorized by the


Department to diagnose, or provide care, treatment, supervision, or


other services to a child who is the subject of a report or record


of child abuse or neglect; provided, the Department may limit such


disclosure to summaries or to information directly necessary for the


purpose of such disclosure;


6. Any person or agency for research purposes, if all of the


following conditions are met:


a. the person or agency conducting the research is


employed by the State of Oklahoma this state or is


under contract with this state and is authorized by


the Department to conduct the research, and


b. the person or agency conducting the research ensures


that all documents containing identifying information


are maintained in secure locations and access to the


documents by unauthorized persons is prohibited; that


no identifying information is included in documents


generated from the research conducted; and that all



Req. No. 3119 Page 8


identifying information is deleted from documents used


in the research when the research is completed;


7. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority; and


8. A medical examiner when such person is determining the cause


of death of a child.


D. In accordance with the rules promulgated for such purpose


pursuant to Section 620.6 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


records listed in subsection A of Section 1-6-102 of this title may


be inspected and their contents disclosed without a court order to


participating agencies.


E. The court may disclose to an employee of an out-of-state


entity, licensed to perform adoption home studies in that state,


whether the prospective adoptive parent has had parental rights to a


child terminated in Oklahoma this state or whether the prospective


adoptive parent has relinquished parental rights to a child in


Oklahoma this state.


F. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting


the Department from disclosing such confidential information as may


be necessary to secure appropriate care, treatment, protection, or


supervision of a child alleged to be abused or neglected.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3119 DC 1/13/2026 9:20:53 PM



Req. No. 3119 Page 9